Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.06.076 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of social and health services to the secretary((;)), the secretary's executive assistant, ((if any; not to exceed six assistant secretaries, thirteen division directors, six regional directors; one confidential secretary for each of the above-named officers; not to exceed six bureau chiefs; and all superintendents of institutions of which the average daily population equals or exceeds one hundred residents))the chief of staff and deputy chief of staff, assistant secretaries, deputy assistant secretaries, senior directors, division directors, assistant and deputy division directors, regional administrators, district managers, and executive officers and superintendents of institutions, and executive assistants supporting the officers named in this section.--- END ---